North Dakota statutes. TITLE 47 Property
CHAPTER 47-10 Real Property Transfers

47-10-01.
Method of transfer.

An estate in real property, other than an estate at will or for a term not exceeding one year, can be transferred only by operation of law or by an instrument in writing, subscribed by the party disposing of the same or by the party’s agent thereunto authorized by writing. This does not abridge the power of any court to compel the specific performance of any agreement for the sale of real property in case of part performance thereof.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, §§ 622, 993; R.C. 1895, §§ 3531, 3960; R.C. 1899, §§ 3531, 3960; R.C. 1905, §§ 4968, 5407; C.L. 1913, §§ 5511, 5963; R.C. 1943, § 47-1001.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1091, 1741.

Cross-References.

Contracts required to be in writing, see N.D.C.C. § 9-06-04.

Minor’s disability to contract relating to real property, see N.D.C.C. § 14-10-09.

Mortgage of real property, see N.D.C.C. ch. 35-03.

Transfer by corporation, see N.D.C.C. § 10-19.1-26 and 47-10-05.1.

Transfer by nonprofit corporation, see N.D.C.C. § 10-33-21.

Part Payment and Improvements.

Part payment of the purchase price and substantial improvements to the property may remove an oral contract from the statute of frauds and create an enforceable contract constituting an enforceable equitable property interest. Williston Coop. Credit Union v. Fossum, 459 N.W.2d 548, 1990 N.D. LEXIS 174 (N.D. 1990).

Part Performance.

Partial performance of a parol agreement concerning the sale of real property takes the contract outside the statute of frauds and equity will enforce specific performance by the party claiming protection of the statute. Fideler v. Norton, 30 N.W. 128, 32 N.W. 57, 4 Dakota 258 (Dakota 1886).

Part payment of the purchase price under a verbal agreement of sale of real estate is not, in and of itself, sufficient to take the verbal agreement out of the statute of frauds. Henry S. Grinde Corp. v. Klindworth, 77 N.D. 597, 44 N.W.2d 417, 1950 N.D. LEXIS 155, 1950 N.D. LEXIS 156 (N.D. 1950).

Partial performance of a parol agreement to convey an interest in real property is sufficient to take the oral agreement out of the statute of frauds. Brandhagen v. Burt, 117 N.W.2d 696, 1962 N.D. LEXIS 94 (N.D. 1962).

In an action by husband and wife, owning building and lot as joint tenants, to quiet title to a portion of their lot upon which defendant’s building encroached, where plaintiff husband entered into an oral agreement with the defendant for use of plaintiffs’ wall as a party wall and for an easement to a strip of plaintiffs’ lot, and pursuant to such oral agreement, the plaintiff husband allowed the defendant to construct his building, using such strip, and attach his building to plaintiffs’ building, and defendant spent large sums of money in construction of his building and to pay for repairs to the party wall, there was sufficient partial performance by the defendant to take the oral agreement out of the statute of frauds as between plaintiff husband and defendant. Brandhagen v. Burt, 117 N.W.2d 696, 1962 N.D. LEXIS 94 (N.D. 1962).

In order to be sufficient to relieve an oral agreement for the sale of real estate from the effect of the statute of frauds, the acts relied upon as partial performance must be of such a nature as to be incomprehensible unless viewed in relation to the contract to convey an interest in land. Parceluk v. Knudtson, 139 N.W.2d 864, 1966 N.D. LEXIS 202 (N.D. 1966).

Standing alone, the payment of money consideration by the buyer generally is not sufficient justification for enforcing an oral contract for the conveyance of real estate. Parceluk v. Knudtson, 139 N.W.2d 864, 1966 N.D. LEXIS 202 (N.D. 1966).

Actions of purchaser did not constitute sufficient part performance to remove an oral contract for the sale of real property from the statute of frauds where there was a dispute as to the amount of the property to be sold and the actions were consistent with either disputed amount. Anderson v. Mooney, 279 N.W.2d 423, 1979 N.D. LEXIS 251 (N.D. 1979).

The general rule is that contracts for the sale of real property and transfers of real property interests must be made by an instrument in writing. However, part performance of an oral contract which is consistent only with the existence of the alleged contract removes it from the statute of frauds. Williston Coop. Credit Union v. Fossum, 459 N.W.2d 548, 1990 N.D. LEXIS 174 (N.D. 1990).

While partial payment of the purchase price alone is not justification for enforcing an oral contract to convey land, partial payment together with other acts such as possession or the making of valuable improvements may be sufficient to take a contract out of the statute of frauds. Williston Coop. Credit Union v. Fossum, 459 N.W.2d 548, 1990 N.D. LEXIS 174 (N.D. 1990).

The trial court erred in granting summary judgment in partnership’s action seeking specific performance of an oral agreement for the purchase of real property where the partnership raised genuine issues of material fact in support of its allegations of an oral contract and partial performance of that contract so as to remove it from the statute of frauds. Johnson Farms v. McEnroe, 1997 ND 179, 568 N.W.2d 920, 1997 N.D. LEXIS 197 (N.D. 1997).

Absent a written contract or agreement, N.D.C.C. § 47-10-01 allowed a court to compel the specific performance of any agreement for the sale of real property in case of part performance thereof; the improvements made by the tenants and relied upon by the trial court did not unmistakably point to the existence of the alleged oral contract and were more consistent with a lease without an option to purchase, such that the alleged oral contract was not removed from the statute of frauds because there was not partial performance consistent only with the existence of the alleged contract. Fladeland v. Gudbranson, 2004 ND 118, 681 N.W.2d 431, 2004 N.D. LEXIS 215 (N.D. 2004).

Trial court did not err in granting possession of land to the personal representative of a mother’s estate because a son failed to prove that he had an oral contract for deed to buy the land from his parents; the son failed to clearly and definitely prove payments made by him were for the purchase of the real estate and he failed to prove by clear and definite evidence the existence of an oral contract for the sale of land which possessed all the necessary elements and features of an enforceable agreement. Although the trial court’s findings about the existence of an oral agreement considered criteria relevant to the statute of frauds, N.D.C.C. § 9-06-04(3), and specific performance in the context of finding there was no contract for the sale of land, the trial court’s findings reflected a correct application of the burden of proof under N.D.C.C. § 47-10-01 for claims for specific performance of an alleged oral contract to convey land.

Thompson v. Thompson (In re Estate of Thompson), 2008 ND 144, 752 N.W.2d 624, 2008 N.D. LEXIS 142 (N.D. 2008).

It was not clear error to find a personal representative did not, under part performance, show an oral contract to sell an estate's real property to himself because (1) alternate theories explained the alleged contract's terms, and (2) the personal representative did not provide unequivocal evidence of the contract. Broten v. Broten, 2015 ND 127, 863 N.W.2d 902, 2015 N.D. LEXIS 115 (N.D. 2015).

In a quiet title action, an oral agreement relating to the purchase of property did not comply with the statute of frauds, and an argument that partial performance of the alleged oral contract precluded the application of the statute of frauds was not considered because it was raised for the first time on appeal. Klein v. Sletto, 2017 ND 26, 889 N.W.2d 918, 2017 N.D. LEXIS 14 (N.D. 2017).

Property owners failed to raise an issue of material fact that part performance removed an alleged agreement with the city from the statute of frauds because the affidavit and testimony of one of the owners provided nothing more than conclusory allegations of part performance; the owner’s testimony went no further than to allege she spent eight years cleaning the city’s streets so she could use them as pasture land. City of Glen Ullin v. Schirado, 2021 ND 72, 959 N.W.2d 47, 2021 N.D. LEXIS 73 (N.D. 2021).

47-10-02.
Sale of realty — Duty of seller.

An agreement to sell real property binds the seller to execute a conveyance in form sufficient to pass the title to the property.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 988; R.C. 1895, § 3955; R.C. 1899, § 3955; R.C. 1905, § 5401; C.L. 1913, § 5957; R.C. 1943, § 47-1002.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1731.

47-10-02.1.
Property disclosure — Requirements — Exceptions.

Unless the transaction is exempted under subsection 7, this section applies to a transaction for the sale, exchange, or purchase of real property if:

A real estate broker, real estate broker associate, or real estate salesperson who is associated with a real estate brokerage firm represents or assists a party to the transaction; and

The real property is a residential dwelling with no more than four units located in this state being sold or exchanged by the owner.

Except as otherwise provided in an offer to purchase agreement, before the parties sign the final acceptance of the purchase agreement for the sale, exchange, or purchase of the real property, the seller in a transaction subject to subsection 1 shall prepare a written disclosure form and shall make the written disclosure form available to the prospective buyer. The written disclosure form must include all material facts the seller is aware could adversely and significantly affect an ordinary buyer’s use and enjoyment of the property or any intended use of the property of which the seller is aware. The written disclosure form must be in the form of the written disclosure form established by the North Dakota real estate commission under subsection 4 or in a substantially similar form and must include latent defects, general condition, environmental issues, structural systems, and mechanical issues regarding the property. The seller shall complete the written disclosure in good faith and based upon the best of the seller’s knowledge at the time of the disclosure.

If a real estate broker, real estate broker associate, or real estate salesperson who is associated with a real estate brokerage firm represents or assists a party to the transaction, following the sale, exchange, or purchase of real property, the brokerage firm shall retain a copy of the written disclosure completed and signed by the seller and signed by the prospective buyer. The brokerage firm’s duties under this section do not supersede any other common law or statutory duties.

The North Dakota real estate commission shall establish and make available a written disclosure form meeting the requirements of this section. In establishing the form, the commission shall consult with stakeholders, such as professional organizations.

If a real estate broker, real estate broker associate, or real estate salesperson who is associated with a real estate brokerage firm violates this section, the state real estate commission may investigate and take disciplinary action under section 43-23-11.1.

Unless the transaction is subject to subsection 1 or exempted under subsection 7, the seller of real property that is a residential dwelling with no more than four units located in this state being sold or exchanged by the owner shall comply with the provisions of this subsection. Except as otherwise provided in an offer to purchase agreement, before the parties sign the final acceptance of the purchase agreement for the sale, exchange, or purchase of the real property, the seller in a transaction subject to this subsection shall disclose to the buyer, in writing, all material facts the seller is aware could adversely and significantly affect an ordinary buyer’s use and enjoyment of the property or any intended use of the property of which the seller is aware. The written disclosure may be in the form of a written property disclosure form.

This section does not apply to transactions for the sale, exchange, or purchase of real property made:

Pursuant to a court order;

Between government agencies;

By a mortgagor in default to a mortgagee;

Pursuant to a foreclosure sale;

By a mortgagee or a beneficiary of a deed of trust who acquired the real property by a:

Foreclosure;

Deed in lieu of foreclosure; or

Collateral assignment of beneficial interest;

By a fiduciary administering a decedent’s estate, guardianship, conservatorship, or trust;

Between co-owners of the real property;

To a spouse, child, parent, sibling, grandchild, or grandparent; or

If the real property is newly constructed residential real property with no previous occupancy.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 334, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2019, ch. 378, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

47-10-03.
Agreement to give usual covenants on sale — Duty imposed.

An agreement on the part of a seller of real property to give the usual covenants binds the seller to insert in the grant covenants of seizin, quiet enjoyment, further assurance, general warranty, and against encumbrances.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 989; R.C. 1895, § 3956; R.C. 1899, § 3956; R.C. 1905, § 5402; C.L. 1913, § 5958; R.C. 1943, § 47-1003.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1733.

Cross-References.

Covenants implied from use of word “grant”, see N.D.C.C. § 47-10-19.

Covenants which run with the land, see N.D.C.C. §§ 47-04-24 to 47-04-26.

Damages for breach of covenant against encumbrances, see N.D.C.C. § 32-03-12.

Damages for breach of covenants in grants, see N.D.C.C. § 32-03-11.

47-10-04.
Form of covenants.

The covenants mentioned in section 47-10-03 must be in substance as follows:

The party of the first part covenants with the party of the second part that the former now is seized in fee simple of the property granted, that the latter shall enjoy the same without any lawful disturbance, that the same is free from all encumbrances, that the party of the first part and all persons acquiring any interest in the same through or for the party of the first part on demand will execute and deliver to the party of the second part, at the expense of the latter, any further assurance of the same that reasonably may be required, and that the party of the first part will warrant to the party of the second part all the said property against every person lawfully claiming the same.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 990; R.C. 1895, § 3957; R.C. 1899, § 3957; R.C. 1905, § 5403; C.L. 1913, § 5959; R.C. 1943, § 47-1004.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1734.

47-10-05.
Grants — Execution — Witnesses sufficient — Seal unnecessary.

The execution of a grant of an estate in real property to entitle the same to be recorded, if it is not acknowledged, must be proved by a subscribing witness or as otherwise provided in sections 47-19-23 and 47-19-24. The absence of the seal of any grantor or grantor’s agent from any grant of an estate made in real property shall not invalidate or in any manner impair the same.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 623; R.C. 1895, § 3536; R.C. 1899, § 3536; R.C. 1905, § 4973; C.L. 1913, § 5516; R.C. 1943, § 47-1005.

Collateral References.

Record of instrument without sufficient acknowledgment as notice, 59 A.L.R.2d 1299.

47-10-05.1.
Presumption of corporate authority of officers — Application.

An officer of any foreign or domestic corporation, or a manager of any foreign or domestic limited liability company, is presumed to have the power and authority to execute and acknowledge, in its behalf, any instrument granting, conveying, or otherwise affecting any interest in or lien upon any property of the corporation or limited liability company, including contracts, mortgages, deeds, plats, replats, easements, rights of way, options, dedications, restrictions, releases, and satisfactions. Any such instrument executed by an officer of the corporation or limited liability company prior to July 1, 1983, and otherwise proper, is valid and effective.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 502, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106.

47-10-06.
Form of grant.

A grant of an estate in real property may be made in substance as follows:

This grant made the day of , in the year of , between A.B., of , of the first part, and C.D., of , of the second part, witnesseth: That the party of the first part hereby grants to the party of the second part in consideration of dollars, now received, all the real property situated in , and bounded (or described) as follows: Witness the hand of the party of the first part. A.B.

Click to view

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 624; R.C. 1895, § 3537; R.C. 1899, § 3537; R.C. 1905, § 4973; C.L. 1913, § 5516; R.C. 1943, § 47-1006.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1092.

Form Not Mandatory.

The form provided in this section may be used but is not required as North Dakota law prescribes no particular form to be used in a grant of real property. Mehus v. Thompson, 266 N.W.2d 920, 1978 N.D. LEXIS 252 (N.D. 1978).

Collateral References.

Validity and effect of one spouse’s conveyance to other spouse of interest in property held as estate by the entireties, 18 A.L.R.5th 230.

47-10-07.
Deed — Execution — Post-office and street address of grantee a prerequisite.

Each deed executed in which real estate is described shall contain the post-office address, and any known or existing street address if within the corporate boundaries of a city, of each grantee named in such deed.

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 249, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 47-1007; S.L. 1975, ch. 421, § 1.

Cross-References.

Deeds not containing post-office address prior to January 1, 1955, validated, see N.D.C.C. § 1-04-22.

Instrument not to be recorded without address, see N.D.C.C. § 47-19-05.

47-10-08.
Grant conclusive against whom.

Every grant of an estate in real property is conclusive against the grantor and every one subsequently claiming under the grantor, except a purchaser or encumbrancer who in good faith and for a valuable consideration acquires a title or lien by an instrument that first is duly recorded.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 629; R.C. 1895, § 3540; R.C. 1899, § 3540; R.C. 1905, § 4977; C.L. 1913, § 5522; R.C. 1943, § 47-1008.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1107.

47-10-09.
Grant valid pro tanto.

A grant made by the owner of an estate for life or years, purporting to transfer a greater estate than the owner could transfer lawfully, does not work a forfeiture of the owner’s estate but passes to the grantee all the estate which the grantor could lawfully transfer.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 630; R.C. 1895, § 3541; R.C. 1899, § 3541; R.C. 1905, § 4978; C.L. 1913, § 5523; R.C. 1943, § 47-1009.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1108.

47-10-10.
Title to highway, street, alley, and public right of way — Vacation.

A transfer of land bounded by a highway, street, alley, or public right of way passes the title of the person whose estate is transferred to the soil of the highway, street, alley, or public right of way in front to the center thereof unless a different intent appears from the grant. Every conveyance of real estate, which abuts upon a vacated highway, street, alley, or other public right of way, shall be construed, unless a contrary intent appears, to include that part of such highway, street, alley, or public right of way which attaches either by operation or presumption of law, to such abutting real estate upon such vacation.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 631; R.C. 1895, § 3542; R.C. 1899, § 3542; R.C. 1905, § 4979; C.L. 1913, § 5524; R.C. 1943, § 47-1010; S.L. 1957, ch. 309, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 47-1010.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1112.

Cross-References.

Covenants of warranty not broken by existence of highway right of way, exception, see N.D.C.C. § 47-04-31.

Presumption of ownership to center of street, see N.D.C.C. § 47-01-16.

47-10-11.
Easements — Pass by transfer of property to which attached.

A transfer of real property passes all easements attached thereto and creates in favor thereof an easement to use other real property of the person whose estate is transferred in the same manner and to the same extent as such property obviously and permanently was used by the person whose estate is transferred, for the benefit thereof, at the time when the transfer was agreed upon or completed.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 627; R.C. 1895, § 3538; R.C. 1899, § 3538; R.C. 1905, § 4975; C.L. 1913, § 5520; R.C. 1943, § 47-1011.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1104.

Cross-References.

Easements attached to other land, see N.D.C.C. § 47-05-01.

47-10-12.
Warranties — Lineal and collateral abolished — Exceptions.

Lineal and collateral warranties with all their incidents are abolished but the heirs and devisees of any person who has made any covenant or agreement in reference to the title of, in, or to any real property are answerable upon such covenant or agreement to the extent of the land descended or devised to them in the cases and in the manner prescribed by law.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 633; R.C. 1895, § 3544; R.C. 1899, § 3544; R.C. 1905, § 4981; C.L. 1913, § 5526; R.C. 1943, § 47-1012.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1105, 1106, 1109, 1110, 1114, 1115.

47-10-13.
Grant presumes fee simple title.

A fee simple title is presumed to be intended to pass by a grant of real property unless it appears from the grant that a lesser estate was intended.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 633; R.C. 1895, § 3545; R.C. 1899, § 3545; R.C. 1905, § 4982; C.L. 1913, § 5527; R.C. 1943, § 47-1013.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1105, 1106, 1109, 1110, 1114, 1115.

47-10-14.
Grant takes effect on performance of condition.

An instrument purporting to be a grant of real property to take effect upon a condition precedent passes the estate upon the performance of the condition.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 633; R.C. 1895, § 3546; R.C. 1899, § 3546; R.C. 1905, § 4983; C.L. 1913, § 5528; R.C. 1943, § 47-1014.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1105, 1106, 1109, 1110, 1114, 1115.

47-10-15.
After-acquired title.

When a person purports by proper instrument to convey real property in fee simple and subsequently acquires any title or claim of title to the real property, the real property passes by operation of law to the person to whom the property was conveyed or that person’s successor. A quitclaim deed that includes the word “grant” in the words of conveyance, regardless of the words used to describe the interest in the real property being conveyed by the grantor, passes after-acquired title. The use of a quitclaim deed, with or without the inclusion of after-acquired title in the deed, does not create any defect in the title of a person that conveys real property. This section applies to any conveyance regardless of when executed.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 633; R.C. 1895, § 3547; R.C. 1899, § 3547; R.C. 1905, § 4984; C.L. 1913, § 5529; R.C. 1943, § 47-1015; S.L. 2013, ch. 346, § 1.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1105, 1106, 1109, 1110, 1114, 1115.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 346, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

47-10-16.
Reconveyance when estate defeated by nonperformance of condition subsequent.

When a grant is made upon condition subsequent and subsequently is defeated by the nonperformance of the condition, the person otherwise entitled to hold under the grant must reconvey the property to the grantor or the grantor’s successors by grant duly acknowledged for record.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 633; R.C. 1895, § 3548; R.C. 1899, § 3548; R.C. 1905, § 4985; C.L. 1913, § 5530; R.C. 1943, § 47-1016.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1105, 1106, 1109, 1110, 1114, 1115.

47-10-17.
Encumbrances defined.

The term encumbrances includes taxes, assessments, and all liens upon real property.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 633; R.C. 1895, § 3549; S.L. 1899, ch. 89, § 1; R.C. 1899, § 3549; R.C. 1905, § 4986; C.L. 1913, § 5531; R.C. 1943, § 47-1017.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1105, 1106, 1109, 1110, 1114, 1115.

47-10-18.
Liability of grantor.

Whoever conveys real estate by deed or mortgage containing a covenant that it is free from all encumbrances, when an encumbrance appears of record to exist thereon, whether known or unknown to that person, shall be liable in an action of contract, to the grantee and the grantee’s heirs, executors, administrators, successors, grantees, or assigns for all damages sustained in removing the same.

Source:

S.L. 1899, ch. 89, § 1; R.C. 1899, § 3549; R.C. 1905, § 4987; C.L. 1913, § 5532; R.C. 1943, § 47-1018.

Cross-References.

Damages for breach of covenant against encumbrances, see N.D.C.C. § 32-03-12.

47-10-19.
Covenants implied from use of word grant.

From the use of the word “grant” in any conveyance by which an estate of inheritance or fee simple is to be passed, the following covenants, and none other, on the part of the grantor for the grantor and the grantor’s heirs to the grantee and the grantee’s heirs and assigns, are implied unless restrained by express terms contained in such conveyance:

That previous to the time of the execution of such conveyance, the grantor has not conveyed the same estate, nor any right, title, or interest therein, to any person other than the grantee; and

That such estate, at the time of the execution of such conveyance, is free from encumbrances done, made, or suffered by the grantor, or any person claiming under the grantor. Such covenants may be sued upon in the same manner as if they had been inserted expressly in the conveyance.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 628; R.C. 1895, § 3539; R.C. 1899, § 3539; R.C. 1905, § 4976; C.L. 1913, § 5521; R.C. 1943, § 47-1019.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1113.

Cross-References.

Damages for breach of covenant against encumbrances, see N.D.C.C. § 32-03-12.

Damages for breach of covenants in grant, see N.D.C.C. § 32-03-11.

47-10-20.
Attornment — When unnecessary.

Grants of rents, reversions, or remainders are good and effectual without attornments of the tenants, but no tenant, who before notice of the grant shall have paid rent to the grantor, must suffer any damage thereby.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 632; R.C. 1895, § 3543; R.C. 1899, § 3543; R.C. 1905, § 4980; C.L. 1913, § 5525; R.C. 1943, § 47-1020.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1111.

Cross-References.

Attornment to stranger void unless made with consent of landlord or in consequence of court judgment, see § 47-16-25.

47-10-21.
Reservation of coal limited to description. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 187, § 108.

47-10-22.
Reservation without description ineffectual. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 187, § 108.

47-10-23.
Transfer by grantor to the grantor and another in joint tenancy.

Any person, firm, corporation, or limited liability company owning a legal or equitable title to or interest in any real property in the state of North Dakota may sell, transfer, and convey the same as grantor to the grantor and any other person, firm, corporation, or limited liability company, including the spouse of said grantor, in joint tenancy, with right of survivorship, without the necessity of any transfer or conveyance to or through any third person.

Source:

S.L. 1943, ch. 213, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 47-1023; S.L. 1993, ch. 54, § 106.

Cross-References.

Personal property interest, transfer by owner to himself and others in joint tenancy, validation of prior transfers, see N.D.C.C. §§ 47-11-14, 47-11-15.

Validating real property transfers in joint tenancy, see N.D.C.C. § 1-04-20.

Collateral References.

Character of tenancy created by owner’s conveyance to himself and another, or to another alone of an undivided interest, 44 A.L.R.2d 595.

47-10-23.1.
Nontestamentary transfer between spouses — Presumption.

A nontestamentary transfer of real property between spouses shall be presumed to be for a consideration, and not a gift, unless otherwise stated in writing at the time of transfer. This presumption is conclusive.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 483, § 1.

47-10-24.
Description and definition of minerals in leases and conveyances.

All conveyances of mineral rights or royalties in real property in this state, excluding leases, shall be construed to grant or convey to the grantee thereof all minerals of any nature whatsoever except those minerals specifically excluded by name in the deed, grant, or conveyance, and their compounds and byproducts, but shall not be construed to grant or convey to the grantee any interest in any gravel, clay, or scoria unless specifically included by name in the deed, grant, or conveyance.

No lease of mineral rights in this state shall be construed as passing any interest to any minerals except those minerals specifically included and set forth by name in the lease. For the purposes of this paragraph the naming of either a specific metalliferous element, or nonmetalliferous element, and if so stated in lease, shall be deemed to include all of its compounds and byproducts, and in the case of oil and gas, all associated hydrocarbons produced in a liquid or gaseous form so named shall be deemed to be included in the mineral named. The use of the words “all other minerals” or similar words of an all-inclusive nature in any lease shall not be construed as leasing any minerals except those minerals specifically named in the lease and their compounds and byproducts.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 235, § 1; 1957, ch. 245, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 47-1024; S.L. 1969, ch. 403, § 1; 1983, ch. 503, § 1.

47-10-25.
Meaning of minerals in deed, grant, or conveyance of title to real property.

In all deeds, grants, or conveyances of the title to the surface of real property executed on or after July 1, 1983, in which all or any portion of the minerals are reserved or excepted and thereby effectively precluded from being transferred with the surface, all minerals, of any nature whatsoever, shall be construed to be reserved or excepted except those minerals specifically excluded by name in the deed, grant, or conveyance and their compounds and byproducts. Gravel, clay, and scoria shall be transferred with the surface estate unless specifically reserved by name in the deed, grant, or conveyance.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 422, § 1; 1983, ch. 504, § 1.

47-10-26.
Authority of trustee.

The trustee of a trust that holds title to real property is presumed to have the power to sell, convey, and encumber the real property unless restrictions on that power appear in the records of the county recorder.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 392, § 1.